District of Columbia statutes.
1-746

Limitation on actions.

No action may be commenced under this chapter with respect to a fiduciary’s breach of any responsibility, duty, or obligation under this subchapter, or with respect to a violation of this subchapter, after the earlier of: (1) Six years after: (A) The date of the last action which constituted a part of the breach or violation; or (B) in the case of an omission, the latest date on which the fiduciary could have cured the breach or violation; or (2) three years after the earliest date: (A) On which the plaintiff had actual knowledge of the breach or violation; or (B) on which a report from which he could reasonably be expected to have obtained knowledge of such breach or violation was filed with the Mayor or the Council under this chapter; except that in the case of fraud or concealment, such an action may be commenced not later than 6 years after the date of discovery of such breach or violation.

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 186
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 3(c), 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 1-746.
1973 Ed., § 1-1846.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “or the Council” for “, the Council, the Speaker, or the President pro tempore”.